src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-oza_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - oza: # Noun 'piece, part, happines / oza' - full paradigm
     oza+N+Sg+Nom: oza
     oza+N+Sg+Gen: ozan
     oza+N+Sg+Acc: [oza, ozan]
     oza+N+Sg+Par: ozua
     oza+N+Sg+Tra: ozakse
     oza+N+Sg+Abe: [ozata, ozattah]
     oza+N+Sg+Com: ozanke
     oza+N+Sg+Ine: ozas
     oza+N+Sg+Ela: [ozaspäi, ozas]
     oza+N+Sg+Ill: ozah
     oza+N+Sg+Ade: ozal
     oza+N+Sg+Abl: [ozalpäi, ozal]
     oza+N+Sg+All: ozale
     oza+N+Sg+Ess: ozannu
     oza+N+Sg+Ter: ozassah
     oza+N+Sg+Apr: ozalluo
     oza+N+Pl+Nom: ozat
     oza+N+Pl+Gen: ozien
     oza+N+Pl+Acc: ozat
     oza+N+Pl+Par: ozii
     oza+N+Pl+Tra: ozikse
     oza+N+Pl+Abe: [ozita, ozittah]
     oza+N+Pl+Com: ozienke
     oza+N+Pl+Ine: ozis
     oza+N+Pl+Ela: [ozispäi, ozis]
     oza+N+Pl+Ill: ozih
     oza+N+Pl+Ade: ozil
     oza+N+Pl+Abl: [ozilpäi, ozil]
     oza+N+Pl+All: ozile
     oza+N+Pl+Ess: ozinnu
     oza+N+Pl+Ins: ozin
     oza+N+Pl+Apr: ozielluo
     oza+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: ozagi
     oza+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: ozangi
     oza+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [ozagi, ozangi]
     oza+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: ozuagi
     oza+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: ozaksegi
     oza+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [ozatagi, ozattahgi]
     oza+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: ozankegi
     oza+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: ozasgi
     oza+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [ozaspäigi, ozasgi]
     oza+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: ozahgi
     oza+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: ozalgi
     oza+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [ozalpäigi, ozalgi]
     oza+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: ozalegi
     oza+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: ozannugi
     oza+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: ozassahgi
     oza+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: ozalluogi
     oza+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: ozatgi
     oza+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: oziengi
     oza+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: ozatgi
     oza+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: oziigi
     oza+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: oziksegi
     oza+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [ozitagi, ozittahgi]
     oza+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: ozienkegi
     oza+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: ozisgi
     oza+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [ozispäigi, ozisgi]
     oza+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: ozihgi
     oza+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: ozilgi
     oza+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [ozilpäigi, ozilgi]
     oza+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: ozilegi
     oza+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: ozinnugi
     oza+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: ozingi
     oza+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: ozielluogi
